Utah statutes.
53A-2-116.   Rights of transferred employees -- Salary during first year -- Leave and tenure benefits.

(1)  If a school employee is transferred from one district to another because of district consolidation or restructuring, the employee's salary may not be less, during the first year after the transfer, than it would have been had the transfer not taken place.

(2)  The district to which an employee is transferred under Subsection (1) shall credit the employee with all accumulated leave and tenure recognized by the district from which the employee was transferred.

(3)  If the district to which an employee is transferred does not have a leave benefit which reasonably corresponds to one the employee seeks to transfer, that district shall compensate the employee for the benefit on the same basis as would have been done had the employee retired.

